Arkansas, session 2025, SB186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-25-304(a), concerning financial
statements filed with the Contractors Licensing Board, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) All persons and entities required by this chapter to be
licensed by the Contractors Licensing Board shall transmit to the board with
their original and renewal applications a financial statement of the
applicant reviewed by a licensed certified public accountant or licensed
public accountant in accordance with the American Institute of Certified
Public Accountants Statements on Standards for Accounting and Review
Services.
(2) However, if the total cost of the work to be completed by
the applicant, including without limitation labor and materials, is less than
seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) one million five hundred
thousand dollars ($1,500,000) for a single commercial project, the applicant
*LGL068*
02-13-2025 10:10:55 LGL068

As Engrossed: S2/13/25 SB186
shall transmit to the board with his or her original and renewal applications
a compiled financial statement of the applicant prepared by a licensed
certified public accountant or licensed public accountant in accordance with
the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants Statements on
Standards for Accounting and Review Services.

/s/J. Bryant





























02-13-2025 10:10:55 LGL068